Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3757
Fee; collection.

The fee provided for by section 2-3755 shall be deducted, as provided by the Dry Bean Resources Act, whether such dry beans are stored or marketed in this state or any other state. The commission may enter into reciprocal agreements with other states for the collection of such fee.

Laws 1987, LB 145, § 23.